CIK: 924717
Company Name: SURMODICS INC
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2017-12-01
Accession Number: 0001564590-17-024465


ITEM 1 BUSINESS. Overview General Surmodics, Inc. and subsidiaries (referred to as Surmodics, the Company, we, us, our and other like terms) is a leading provider of medical device and in vitro diagnostic technologies to the healthcare industry. Our mission is to improve the treatment and detection of disease by using our technology to provide solutions to difficult medical device and diagnostic challenges. Our business segments partner with many of the world leading and emerging medical device, diagnostic and life science companies to develop and commercialize innovative products designed to improve patient diagnosis and treatment. In fiscal 2017, our business performance continued to be driven by growth in our core Medical Device and In Vitro Diagnostics ( IVD ) businesses, while we continued medical device product and platform development leveraging the technologies and manufacturing capabilities acquired with the fiscal 2016 acquisitions of Creagh Medical Ltd. ( Creagh Medical ) and NorMedix, Inc. ( NorMedix ) (together the Fiscal 2016 Acquisitions ) in our Medical Device business unit. The Company was organized as a Minnesota corporation in June 1979. We make available, free of charge, copies of our annual report on Form 10 K, quarterly reports on Form 10 Q, current reports on Form 8 K and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act ) on our website, www.surmodics.com , as soon as reasonably practicable after filing such material electronically or otherwise furnishing it to the SEC. We are not including the information on our website as a part of, or incorporating it by reference into, our Form 10 K. The information below provides an overview of the principal products, services and markets for each of our 2 business units. For more information regarding domestic and foreign revenue and revenue by our business units, also known as our operating segments, for each of our last 3 fiscal years, see Note 12 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. The discussion of other aspects of our business including research and development ( R&D ), intellectual property, marketing and sales, future acquisition strategy, significant customers, competition, manufacturing, government regulation and our employees applies to our business in general and we describe material segment information within these sections where relevant. Medical Device Segment Advances in medical device technology have helped drive improved device efficacy and patient outcomes. The convergence of the pharmaceutical, biotechnology and medical device industries, often made possible by surface coatings and device drug delivery technologies, (together, surface modification coating technologies ) presents an opportunity for major advancements in the healthcare industry. We believe the benefits of combining drugs and biologics with implantable and minimally invasive devices are becoming increasingly valuable in applications in cardiology, peripheral vascular disease, ophthalmology, orthopedics and other large markets. In an effort to improve their existing products or develop entirely new devices, a growing number of medical device manufacturers are exploring or using surface modification and device drug delivery technologies as product differentiators or device enablers. The continuing trend toward minimally invasive surgical procedures, which often employ catheter based delivery technologies, has increased the demand for hydrophilic (i.e., lubricious or slippery) coatings and other coating technologies. For example, stents, particularly drug eluting stents, have significantly reduced the need for repeat intravascular procedures, and they have diminished the need for more invasive cardiac bypass surgery. Drug coated balloons have further transformed intravascular therapies by enhancing patient outcomes while not leaving stents in the vascular system. Transcatheter heart valve repair or replacement via a minimally invasive catheter based system has enabled the treatment of patients suffering from heart valve disease who are too ill to undergo open heart surgery. Positive clinical outcomes and acceptance of these and other similar innovations by patients, physicians and insurance companies has helped certain segments of the United States ( U.S. ) medical device industry grow at a faster pace than the economy as a whole. The attractiveness of the industry has drawn intense competition among the companies participating in this area. Our Medical Device segment provides surface modification coating technologies that impart lubricity, prohealing or biocompatibility characteristics, or drug delivery capabilities, as well as vascular device, catheter and balloon design, development and manufacturing capabilities. Historically, we have provided surface modification technologies to enhance our customers medical devices and delivery systems. Since fiscal 2013, with our investment in our drug coated balloon ( DCB ) platform, we have been focused on a strategy to develop and manufacture proprietary medical device products that combine our surface modification 3 coatings with medical devices or delivery systems ( whole product solutions ). This strategy does not change our focus on our core surface modification technologies, however we believe it will greatly increase our relevance in the indust ry and is key to our future growth and profitability, given the prospect of capturing more revenue and operating margin with whole product solutions. Our aim is to provide customers earlier access to highly differentiated whole product solutions that addre ss unmet clinical needs, and partner with them on successful commercialization. During fiscal 2017, we continued investing in our whole product solutions strategy and achieved meaningful strategic milest1s, including the initiation of the TRANSCEND SurVeil DCB pivotal clinical trial, as well as U.S. Food and Drug Administration ( FDA ) and Conformit Europ enne ( CE Mark ) clearance for our .014 low profile percutaneous transluminal angioplasty balloon dilation catheter ( .014 PTA balloon catheter ), designed for peripheral angioplasty procedures. Overview of Interventional Peripheral Market and Whole Products Solutions Strategy Peripheral artery disease ( PAD ) is a condition that causes a narrowing of the blood vessels supplying the extremities, most often due to plaque buildup in the arterial walls. Left untreated, PAD may lead to symptoms such as large non healing ulcers, infections, or gangrene, and may require limb amputation or, in extreme cases, result in death. The American Heart Association has reported that an estimated 8.5 million Americans and 202 million people worldwide are living with PAD. The number of people affected by PAD is expected to increase as a result of an aging population, coupled with increasing prevalence of conditions linked to PAD, such as diabetes and obesity. The interventional PAD market utilizes a variety of access and therapy catheters to treat PAD. These technologies are delivered through a number of access points into the vascular system including femoral (leg), radial (wrist or arm) and pedal (foot). Our business model for our whole product solutions strategy is to design, develop and manufacture products incorporating our proprietary catheter, balloon and surface modification coating technologies. Our whole product solutions strategy has been built on the acquisition of state of the art medical device design, development and manufacturing capabilities to complement our leadership in surface modification coating technologies to develop whole product solutions for treatment of PAD and other vascular diseases. The Creagh Medical acquisition brought a state of the art R&D and manufacturing facility offering robust extrusion, balloon forming, top assembly, packaging and regulatory capabilities focused on balloon catheters. The NorMedix acquisition provided ultra thin walled, minimally invasive catheter technologies. We have integrated our balloon catheter, ultra thin walled catheter and surface modification technologies to design, develop and manufacture proprietary products. We are currently seeking third party companies to distribute our products to end users. During fiscal 2017 we received FDA 510(k) clearance and CE Mark for our first whole product solution, a .014 PTA balloon catheter, and expect to receive regulatory approval for several additional catheter and balloon based products throughout calendar 2018. We are currently in discussions with potential partners to distribute our .014 PTA balloon catheter. Surmodics is focused on the development of drug coated balloons to treat PAD. The development of the SurVeil DCB is a major step forward in our strategy to offer whole product solutions for the medical device industry. During fiscal 2016, we initiated PREVEIL, an early feasibility clinical trial of the SurVeil DCB, which is intended to treat PAD in the leg above the knee. Enrollment in PREVEIL was completed in the second quarter of fiscal 2017. We began enrollment in the TRANSCEND SurVeil DCB pivotal clinical study in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2017, with the objective of obtaining data necessary to support regulatory approvals and reimbursement for this device in the U.S. We also plan to initiate SurVeil DCB clinical trials in Europe to support CE Mark approval. Until regulatory approvals have been obtained, our SurVeil DCB is not approved for commercial sale. In addition to our SurVeil DCB program, we are developing other DCB for treatment of PAD below the knee ( BTK ) and arteriovenous ( AV ) fistulae, commonly associated with hemodialysis. Overview of Surmodics Surface Modification and Device Drug Delivery Technologies We believe Surmodics is positi1d to take advantage of the continuing trend of incorporating surface modification and device drug delivery technologies into the design of combination products, potentially leading to more efficient and effective products as well as new product applications. We have a growing proprietary technology portfolio that incorporates our market expertise and insight, as well as unique collaborative research, development and manufacturing capabilities key ingredients to bring innovation together to benefit patients, us, and the healthcare industry. 4 Coatings for Surface Modification and Device Drug Delivery Key differentiating characteristics of our coating platforms are their flexibility, durability and ease of use. In terms of flexibility, coatings can be applied to many different kinds of surfaces and can immobilize a variety of chemical, pharmaceutical and biological agents. Additionally, the surface modification process can be tailored to provide customers with the ability to improve their devices performance by choosing the specific coating properties desired for particular applications. Our surface modification technologies also can be combined to deliver multiple surface enhancing characteristics on the same device. Our proprietary PhotoLink coating technology is a versatile, easily applied, coating technology that modifies medical device surfaces by creating covalent bonds between device surfaces and a variety of chemical agents. PhotoLink coatings can impart many performance enhancing characteristics, such as advanced lubricity (slippery) and hemocompatibility (preventing blood clot formation), when bound onto surfaces of medical devices or other biological materials without materially changing the dimensions or other physical properties of devices. PhotoLink reagents can be applied to a variety of substrates. The coating formulations are easily applied to the material surface by a variety of methods including, but not limited to, dipping, spraying, roll coating or ink jetting. We continue to expand our proprietary reagent portfolio for use by our customers. These reagents enable our customers to develop novel surface features for their devices, satisfying the expanding healthcare industry requirements. We are also continually working to expand the list of materials that are compatible with our surface modification and device drug delivery reagents. Additionally, we develop coating processes and coating equipment to meet the device quality, manufacturing throughput and cost requirements of our customers. The PhotoLink coating process is relatively simple to use and is easily integrated into the customer manufacturing process. In addition, the process does not subject the coated products to harsh chemical or temperature conditions, produces no hazardous byproducts, and does not require lengthy processing or curing time. Further, our PhotoLink coatings are generally compatible with accepted sterilization processes, so the surface attributes are not lost when the medical device is sterilized. We launched our Serene hydrophilic coating platform in fiscal 2013, which optimizes lubricity and durability while significantly reducing particulates generation. This next generation coating has demonstrated excellent lubricity on a wide range of substrates, and has been used on FDA cleared coronary, peripheral and structural heart devices. Serene coatings are applied using our PhotoLink process. Our device drug delivery coating technologies allow therapeutic drugs to be incorporated within our proprietary polymer matrices to provide controlled, site specific release of the drug into the surrounding environment. The drug release can be tuned to elute quickly (within minutes to a few days) or slowly (from several months to over a year), illustrating the wide range of release profiles that can be achieved with our coating systems. On a wide range of devices, drug eluting coatings can help improve device performance, increase patient safety and enable innovative new treatments. Examples of short term use drug delivery devices would include drug coated balloons and examples of longer term drug delivery devices would include drug eluting stents. We work with companies in the medical device and biotechnology industries to develop specialized coatings that allow for the controlled release of drugs from device surfaces. We see at least 3 primary areas with strong future potential (1) improving the function of a device which itself is necessary to treat the medical condition; (2) enabling site specific drug delivery while limiting systemic exposure; and (3) enhancing the biocompatibility of a medical device to ensure that it continues to function over a long period of time. Licensing Arrangements We commercialize our surface modification and device drug delivery technologies primarily through licensing arrangements with medical device manufacturers. We believe this approach allows us to focus our resources on further developing new technologies and expanding our licensing activities. Many of our technologies have been designed to allow manufacturers to implement them easily into their own manufacturing processes so customers can control production and quality internally without the need to send their products to a contract manufacturer. We generate the largest portion of our revenue through licensing arrangements. Royalties and license fees represented 435%, 46.5% and 513% of our total revenue in fiscal 2017, 2016 and 2015, respectively. Greater than 96% of our royalties and license fees revenue in this 3 year period were generated from hydrophilic coating licenses. Revenue from these licensing arrangements typically includes license fees and milest1 payments, minimum royalties, and royalties based on a percentage of licensees product sales. We also generate revenue from reagent chemical sales to licensees for use in their coating processes. 5 The licensing process begins with the customer specifying a desired product feature to be created such as lubricity or drug delivery. Because each device and coating application is unique, we routinel y conduct a feasibility study to qualify each new potential product application, often generating commercial development revenue. Feasibility studies can range in duration from several months to a year. After we complete a feasibility study, our customers cannot market their product until they receive regulatory approval. As further described under the caption Government Regulation, the regulatory approval process varies in each country and ranges from several months to four or more years. At any time pr ior to a customer commercial launch, a license agreement may be executed granting the licensee rights to use our technology. We often support our customers by providing coating assistance for parts required in animal tests and human clinical trials. Typi cally, we complete a technology transfer to most customers which enables those customers to apply the coating at their own facilities. License agreement terms are generally for a specified number of years or our patent life, whichever is longer, although a license generally may be terminated by the licensee for any reason upon 90 days advance written notice. In cases where the royalty obligation extends beyond the life of the applicable patent, it is because the license also includes rights to our know how or other proprietary rights. Under these circumstances, the royalty obligation typically continues at a reduced royalty rate for a specified number of years generally following the date on which the customer product was first sold. Our license agreements may include certain license fees and or milest1 payments. Substantially all our licensed applications are n1xclusive, allowing us to license technology to multiple customers. Moreover, even exclusive licenses generally are limited to a specific field of use, allowing us the opportunity to further license technology to other customers. The royalty rate on a substantial number of the agreements has traditionally been in the 2% to 3% range, but there are certain contracts with lower or higher rates. In certain agreements, our royalty is based on an agreed upon amount per unit. License fees, milest1 payments, and the royalty rates are based on various factors, including the licensed product or technology stage of development, the perceived value of our technology to the customer product, the size of the potential market, and whether the arrangement is exclusive or n1xclusive. Our agreements generally incorporate a minimum royalty to be paid by the licensee. Royalty payments generally commence 1 quarter after the customer actual product sales occur because of the delay in reporting sales by our licensees. As such, we currently recognize royalty revenue in the quarter customer royalty payments are due to us. Commencing in fiscal 2019 we are required to adopt a new revenue recognition accounting standard that will require us to recognize and accrue royalty revenue in the same quarter that the underlying customer product sale occurs. We have over 150 licensed product classes (customer products utilizing Surmodics technology) already in the market generating royalties and greater than 100 customer product classes incorporating our technology in various stages of pre commercialization. We signed 17, 18 and 22 new licenses in fiscal 2017, 2016 and 2015, respectively. Under our customer license agreements, the responsibility for securing regulatory approval for and ultimately commercializing these products rests with our customers. Our reliance on our customers in this regard and the potential risks to our operations as a result are discussed in Item 1A Risk Factors of this Form 10 K. Moreover, we are often contractually obligated to keep the details concerning our customers R&D efforts (including the timing of expected regulatory filings, approvals and market introductions) confidential. Given the significant uncertainty inherent in product development and regulatory approval processes, the expected timing for regulatory approval and commercialization for the product classes pending regulatory approval is can vary greatly. Our licensing agreements generally require us to keep our customers identities confidential, unless they approve of such disclosure. Licensed customers who allow the use of their name include Abbott Laboratories ( Abbott ), Boston Scientific Corporation ( Boston Scientific ), Cook Medical, Cordis Corporation (a subsidiary of Cardinal Health, Inc.) ( Cordis ), Covidien PLC (a subsidiary of Medtronic), Edwards Lifesciences Corporation, Evalve, Inc. (a subsidiary of Abbott), ev3 Inc. (a subsidiary of Medtronic), Medtronic, OrbusNeich Medical, Inc., and Spectranetics Corporation (a subsidiary of Koninklijke Philips N.V.). In Vitro Diagnostics Segment Our In Vitro Diagnostics ( IVD ) business unit sells stabilization products, substrates, antigens and surface coatings to diagnostics customers. We manufacture or sell comp1nts for in vitro diagnostic immunoassay and molecular tests and we manufacture and sell surface coatings to the diagnostic, biomedical research, and life science markets. Immunoassay Diagnostics. An immunoassay is a biochemical test that measures the presence or concentration of a target molecule, or analyte , in a biological fluid or sample. Analyte levels are correlated to the patient disease state or medical condition of a patient to diagnose the presence, absence or severity of disease. Analytes can range from large molecules such as proteins to small molecules such as horm1s. Immunoassays are developed and produced using multiple comp1nts. The comp1nt selection and optimization confer the assay quality and performance of the assay in terms of sensitivity and 6 specificity. IVD companies select these critical biochemical and reagent comp1nts to meet the assay diagnostic specifications. We develop, ma nufacture and sell high performing, consistent quality and stable immunoassay comp1nt products to enable our customers diagnostic tests to detect the absence or presence of disease. Molecular Diagnostics DNA and Protein Immobilization. Both DNA and protein microarrays are useful tools for the pharmaceutical, diagnostic and research industries. During a DNA gene analysis, typically thousands of different probes need to be placed in a pattern on a surface, called a DNA microarray. These microarrays are used by the pharmaceutical industry to screen for new drugs, by genome mappers to sequence human, animal or plant genomes, or by diagnostic companies to search a patient sample for disease causing bacteria or viruses. However, DNA does not readily adhere to most surfaces. We have developed various surface chemistries for both DNA and protein immobilization. Protein microarrays are used as diagnostic and research tools to determine the presence and or quantity of proteins in a biological sample. The most common type of protein microarray is the antibody microarray, where antibodies are spotted onto a surface and used as capture molecules for protein detection. The sales cycle for our IVD products generally begins when an IVD company initiates the process to develop a new, or improve a current, diagnostic test. During product development, these companies will look to source the test critical comp1nts with reagents it produces internally or with reagents from a supplier, such as Surmodics. As IVD tests are developed and various reagents are tested, companies will generally seek to optimize the sensitivity (false negative reductions), specificity (false positive reductions), speed (time from sample to results), convenience (ideally as few steps as possible) and cost effectiveness. Upon regulatory approval or clearance, the customer diagnostic test can be sold in the marketplace. It may take several years after approval or clearance for the test to achieve peak market share and optimize Surmodics revenue. Overview of In Vitro Diagnostics Products Protein Stabilizers. We offer a full line of stabilization products for the IVD market. These products increase sensitivity, reduce false positive and false negative results, while extending the diagnostic test shelf life, thereby producing more consistent assay results. Our stabilization products are ready to use, eliminating the in house manufacturing preparation time and cost of producing stabilization and blocking reagents. Substrates. We also provide colorimetric and chemiluminescent substrates to the IVD market under our BioFX trademark. A substrate is the diagnostic test kit comp1nt that detects and signals that a reaction has taken place so that a result can be recorded. Colorimetric substrates signal a positive diagnostic result through a color change. Chemiluminescent substrates signal a positive diagnostic result by emitting light. We believe that our substrates offer a high level of stability, sensitivity and consistency. Antigens. We are the exclusive distributor in the United States, Canada and Puerto Rico (and non exclusive distributor in Japan) of DIARECT AG line of antigens. Because of the lack of high quality antigens from natural sources, DIARECT produces the majority of these antigens and other comp1nts using recombinant technology. Surface Coatings for Molecular Diagnostic Applications. We offer custom coatings for molecular diagnostic applications, including DNA, RNA and protein microarrays. Our TRIDIA surface coatings bind molecules to a variety of surfaces and geometries and may be customized for selectivity using passivating polymers and reactive groups. This proprietary technology immobilizes DNA and protein to adhere to testing surfaces. We offer other surface coatings that improve flow characteristics through membranes and microfluidic channels on diagnostic devices including point of care comp1nts. Research and Development Our R&D personnel work to enhance and expand our technology and product offerings in the area of whole product solutions, drug delivery, surface modification, and in vitro diagnostics through internal scientific investigation and proprietary product development. These scientists and engineers also evaluate external technologies in support of our corporate development activities. Our R&D efforts are all guided by the needs of the markets in which we do business. Additionally, the R&D staff support the business development staff and business units in performing feasibility studies, providing technical assistance to existing and potential customers. These services, which generate our research, development and other revenue, include optimizing the relevant technologies for specific customer applications, supporting clinical trials, training customers, and integrating our technologies and know how into customer manufacturing operations and developing whole product solutions that meet customers needs by integrating our coating, medical device and medical device delivery technologies. 7 In fiscal 2017, 2016 and 2015, our R&D expenses were $318 million, $18.5 million and $16.2 million, respectively. Included in R&D expenses are the costs associated with our research, develo pment and other revenue. We intend to continue significantly investing in R&D to advance our whole product solutions, surface modification coatings, device drug delivery and in vitro diagnostic technologies and to expand uses for our technology platforms. We anticipate an increase in R&D expenses in fiscal 2018 primarily related to whole product solutions product development, including our DCB development and clinical study activities. In addition, we continue to pursue access to products and technologies d eveloped outside the Company to complement our internal R&D efforts. Medical Device Segment As treatment technologies become more sophisticated and increasingly leverage minimally invasive techniques, we believe the need for improved medical devices that benefit from surface modification and device drug delivery will continue to grow. We intend to continue our development efforts to expand our whole product solutions offerings including advancing our surface modification and device drug delivery technologies to better meet these needs across multiple medical markets and to capture more of the final product value. Our whole products solutions R&D activities are primarily focused on the peripheral vascular market, where we believe the integration of our surface modification, balloon catheter and ultra thin walled catheter technologies will result in unique devices capable of producing better patient outcomes in complex, difficult to treat arterial disease cases. We are doing this by developing or acquiring technologies and funding development activities that may include pre clinical and clinical studies. With the Fiscal 2016 Acquisitions and subsequent investments in our R&D infrastructure and facilities, we have strengthened our capabilities and broadened our capacity for R&D activities. Our facility in Ballinasloe, Ireland is fully equipped for R&D and manufacturing and is focused on design and manufacture of peripheral vascular devices. This facility capabilities include balloon forming, extrusion, coating, braiding and assembly of finished products. The facility is equipped for medical device R&D and manufacturing with space for future growth. In the first quarter of fiscal 2017, we completed an expansion of R&D and manufacturing clean rooms as well as an analytical lab to support our whole product solutions strategy. With the NorMedix acquisition, we obtained a differentiated catheter technology platform and additional design and development expertise that have enhanced the value we offer our medical device customers and accelerated our development of proprietary medical device products. We have continued to develop surface modification coating and DCB chemistry technologies in our Eden Prairie, Minnesota facilities. Our proprietary, whole product solutions integrate our surface modification coatings, catheter and balloon technologies and are being developed with a combined team from our U.S. and Irish facilities. In addition to our DCB platform products, we are executing on our plan to develop and commercialize 12 15 medical device products over the next 5 years. Additional planned activities include initiation of surface modification experiments that improve medical device performance, as well as incorporation of our catheter technology platform into various other devices intended for the emerging peripheral vascular treatment market. We received FDA clearance and CE Mark for the .014 PTA balloon catheter in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2017 and we expect to receive regulatory clearance for several additional, newly developed products during calendar 2018. In addition to proprietary medical device product development, we work with our customers to integrate the best possible surface modification and device drug delivery technologies with their products, not only to meet their performance requirements, but also to perform services quickly so that the product may reach the market ahead of the competition. To quickly solve problems that might arise during the development and optimization process, we have developed extensive capabilities in analytical chemistry and surface characterization within our R&D organization. Our state of the art instrumentation and extensive experience allow us to test the purity of coating reagents, to monitor the elution rate of drug from coatings, to measure coating thickness and smoothness, and to map the distribution of chemicals throughout coatings. We believe our capabilities in this area exceed those of our direct competitors. In Vitro Diagnostics Segment Our R&D efforts to grow our IVD business unit include identifying and addressing unmet needs that exist in the global IVD market place. Our pipeline of IVD products includes comp1nts for immunoassay and molecular diagnostic applications, such as, new protein stabilizers, detection technologies, accessory reagents and surface coatings that have the potential to add greater sensitivity, specificity, speed, convenience and lower cost for IVD test manufacturers. In fiscal 2016 we launched StabilBlock Immunoassay Stabilizer, our most advanced stabilizer product. Clinical Trials Our PREVEIL first in human early feasibility study using the SurVeil DCB completed enrollment in the second quarter of fiscal 2017. In PREVEIL, six month results indicated that acute success measures of safety were achieved in all patients, as well as 100 percent primary patency and encouraging late lumen loss at six months post procedure. In July 2017, we received an investigational device exemption ( IDE ) from the FDA to initiate a pivotal clinical trial of the SurVeil DCB. The randomized clinical trial, TRANSCEND, 8 will evaluate the SurVeil DCB for treatment for PAD in the upper leg compared with the Medtronic IN.PACT Admiral DCB. The objective of the TRANSCEND clinical trial is to evaluate the safety and effectiveness of the SurVeil DCB device for treatment of subjects with symptomatic PAD due to stenosis of the femoral and or popliteal arteries. If successful, the TRANSCEND clinical trial will be used to support regulatory approvals and reimbursement (U.S. and Europe). The trial will enroll up to 446 subjects at up to 60 sites in the U.S. and 18 outside the U.S. Study participants will be randomized to receive either treatment with SurVeil DCB or IN.PACT Admiral DCB. The trial primary efficacy endpoi nt is primary patency, defined as a composite of freedom from restenosis and clinically driven target lesion revascularization through 12 months post index procedure. All randomized subjects will be followed through 60 months post index procedure. We initi ated enrollment in the TRANSCEND clinical trial in October 2017 and have engaged a clinical research organization to assist us with the administration of the clinical trial. There is no assurance that the TRANSCEND clinical trial will support regulatory ap proval, or that any anticipated time frame will be met. We estimate that the cost of the TRANSCEND clinical trial will range between $32 million to $40 million over the next several years. In connection with our whole product solutions strategy, we plan to continue to sponsor and support clinical investigations to evaluate patient safety and clinical efficacy when necessary to support regulatory approval or clearance for new product initiatives. We will generate the clinical data necessary to seek regulatory approval or clearance for our existing and emerging products. Patents and Proprietary Rights Patents and other forms of proprietary rights are an essential part of Surmodics business. The Company aggressively pursues patent protection covering the proprietary technologies that we consider strategically important to our business. In addition to seeking patent protection in the U.S., we also generally file patent applications in European countries and, on a selective basis, other foreign countries. We strategically manage our patent portfolio so as to ensure that we have valid and enforceable patent rights protecting our technological innovations. We protect our extensive portfolio of technologies through filing and maintaining patent rights covering a variety of coatings, drug delivery methods, reagents, and formulations, as well as particular clinical device applications. During fiscal 2017, Surmodics filed 4 original U.S. patent applications, as well as 9 international patent applications. As of September 30, 2017, Surmodics owned or had exclusive rights to 55 pending U.S. patent applications and 135 foreign patent applications. Likewise, as of the same date, Surmodics owned or had exclusive rights to 147 issued U.S. patents and 198 international patents. We have licensed our PhotoLink hydrophilic technology on a non exclusive basis to a number of our customers for use in a variety of medical device surface applications, including those described above. In particular, we have 30 issued U.S. patents, 10 pending U.S. patent applications, 34 issued international patents, and 32 pending international patent applications protecting various aspects of these technologies, including compositions, methods of manufacture and methods of coating devices. The expiration dates for these patents and anticipated expiration dates of the patent applications range from fiscal 2020 to 2035. Moreover, these patents and patent applications represent distinct families, with each family generally covering a successive generation of the technology, including improvements that enhance coating performance, manufacturability, or other important features desired by our customers. Among these, our third generation PhotoLink technology is protected by a family of patents that expired in November 2015 (in the U.S.) and October 2016 (in certain other countries). In addition, our fourth generation of our PhotoLink technology is protected by a family of patents that is expected to expire in early fiscal 2020. As noted above in Licensing Arrangements, the royalty obligation in our typical license agreement is generally for a specified number of years or the patent life, whichever is longer. In cases where the royalty obligation extends beyond the life of the applicable patent, it is because the license also includes rights to our know how or other proprietary rights. Under these circumstances, the royalty obligation will continue at a reduced royalty rate for a specified number of years, as determined based on the specific terms and conditions of the applicable customer agreement, generally tied to the date on which the customer product was first sold. In recent years, we have successfully converted a number of our customer products utilizing this early generation technology to our advanced generation technologies. The royalty revenue associated with our third generation technology which has not yet converted, or is not in the process of converting, to our advanced generation technologies was approximately 12% of our fiscal 2017 revenue. Approximately 21% of our total revenue in fiscal 2017 was generated from the fourth generation of our PhotoLink technology, which are protected by a family of patents that will begin to expire in fiscal 2020. Of the license agreements using our early generation technologies, most will continue to generate royalty revenue at a reduced royalty rate beyond patent expiration. We also rely upon trade secrets, trademarks and other unpatented proprietary technologies. We seek to maintain the confidentiality of such information by requiring employees, consultants and other parties to sign confidentiality agreements and by limiting access by parties outside the Company to such information. There can be no assurance, however, that these measures will 9 prevent the un authorized disclosure or use of this information, or that others will not be able to independently develop such information. Additionally, there can be no assurance that any agreements regarding confidentiality and non disclosure will not be breached, or, in the event of any breach, that adequate remedies would be available to us. Marketing and Sales Our aim is to use our design, development, manufacturing and commercialization capabilities to provide our customers earlier access to highly differentiated products that address important unmet clinical needs, and partner with them on successful commercialization of these products. While whole product solutions development and manufacturing capability and capacity scale up have been a significant focus, it does not change our business model to provide world class surface modification coating technologies to our medical device customers. Sales professionals working within our Medical Device business work in concert with our R&D personnel to coordinate customer activities. Our sales professionals specialization fosters an in depth knowledge of the issues faced by our customers within these markets such as industry trends, technology changes, biomaterial changes and the regulatory environment. As we complete development of our whole product solutions medical devices, we are seeking third parties to sell these products. With respect to our diagnostics products, our sales professionals sell directly to IVD kit manufacturers and we enter into sales and marketing relationships with third parties to distribute those products around the world. We also offer those products for sale through our website. See Note 12 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data in this Annual Report on Form 10 K for information regarding domestic and foreign revenue. To support our marketing and sales activities, we publish technical literature on our various surface modification, drug delivery, and in vitro diagnostics technologies and products. In addition, we exhibit at major trade shows and technical meetings, advertise in selected trade journals and through our website, and conduct direct mailings to appropriate target markets. We also offer ongoing customer service and technical support to our customers. This service and support may begin with a feasibility study, and also may include additional services such as assistance in the transfer of the technology to the customer, further optimization, process control and troubleshooting, preparation of product for clinical studies, and assistance with regulatory submissions for product approval. Some of these services are billable to customers, mainly feasibility and optimization activities. Acquisitions To further our strategic objectives and strengthen our existing businesses, we intend to continue to explore acquisitions and strategic collaborations to diversify and grow our business. As a result, we expect to make future acquisitions where we believe that we can broaden or enhance our technology offerings and expand our revenue sources and the markets in which we participate. Mergers and acquisitions of medical and diagnostic technology companies are inherently risky, and no assurance can be given that any of our previous or future acquisitions will be successful or will not materially adversely affect our consolidated results of operations, financial condition, or cash flows. Significant Customers Revenue from Medtronic represented approximately 18% of our consolidated revenue for the year ended September 30, 2017 and was generated from multiple products and fields of use, substantially all of which were recognized in our Medical Device segment. The percentage of revenue from Medtronic decreased in fiscal 2017 as our customer base was diversified with the Fiscal 2016 Acquisitions. No other customer provided more than 6% of our consolidated revenue in fiscal 2017. 2 customers in our IVD business accounted for 13% and 10%, respectively, of our IVD operating segment revenue. Competition Medical Device Segment We believe that the intense competition within the medical device market creates opportunities for our technologies as medical device manufacturers seek to differentiate their products through new enhancements or to remain competitive with enhancements offered by other manufacturers. Upon receiving regulatory clearance for our proprietary products, we plan to seek third parties to sell these whole product solutions products. Our core balloon and catheter capabilities compete with larger original equipment manufacturer (OEM) suppliers, as well as some of our largest medical device partners that have in house resources to produce balloons and catheters. We provide differentiated whole product solutions that integrate our surface modification, catheter, balloon and other proprietary technologies. 10 Because a significant portion of our revenue depends on royalties derived from our customers medical device product sales incorporating our surface modification coating technologies, we are also affec ted by competition within the markets for such devices. As we typically license our surface modification coating technologies on a non exclusive basis, we benefit by offering our technologies to multiple competing manufacturers of a device. However, compet ition in the medical device market could also have an adverse effect on us. While we seek to license our products to established manufacturers, in certain cases, our surface modification licensees may compete directly with larger, dominant manufacturers wi th extensive product lines and greater sales, marketing and distribution capabilities. We also are unable to control other factors that may impact commercialization of our whole product solutions and licensees with medical devices that utilize our surface modification coatings, such as regulatory approval, marketing and sales efforts of our customers and licensees or competitive pricing pressures within the particular market. Many of our existing and potential competitors have greater financial, technical and marketing resources than we have. The ability for surface modification coating technologies to improve the performance of medical devices and drugs and to enable new product categories has resulted in increased competition in these markets. Some of our competitors offer device drug delivery technologies, while others specialize in lubricious or hemocompatible coating technology. Some of these companies target cardiovascular, peripheral or other medical device applications. In addition, because of the many product possibilities afforded by surface modification technologies, many of the large medical device manufacturers have developed, or are engaged in efforts to develop, internal competency in the area of surface modification and device drug delivery. We attempt to differentiate ourselves from our competitors by providing what we believe is a high value added approach to drug delivery and surface modification technology. We believe that the primary factors customers consider in choosing a particular technology include performance (e.g., flexibility, ability to fine tune drug elution profiles, biocompatibility), ease of manufacturing, time to market, intellectual property protection, ability to produce multiple products from a single process, compliance with manufacturing regulations, ability to manufacture clinical and commercial products, customer service and total cost of goods (including manufacturing process labor). We believe our technologies deliver exceptional performance in these areas, allowing us to compete favorably with respect to these factors. With respect to our licensed surface modification technologies, we believe that the cost and time required to obtain the necessary regulatory approvals significantly reduces the likelihood of a customer changing the manufacturing process it uses once a device or drug has been approved for sale. In Vitro Diagnostics Segment Competition in the diagnostics market is highly fragmented. In the product lines in which we compete (protein stabilization reagents, substrates, recombinant autoimmune antigens and surface chemistry technologies), we face an array of competitors ranging from large manufacturers with multiple business lines to small manufacturers that offer a limited selection of products. Some of our competitors have substantially more capital resources, marketing experience, R&D resources and production facilities than we do. We believe that our products compete on performance, stability (shelf life), sensitivity (lower levels detected, faster results), consistency and price. We believe that our continued competitive success will depend on our ability to gain market share, to develop or acquire new proprietary products, obtain patent or other protection for our products and successfully market our products directly or through partners. Manufacturing We manufacture our surface modification and drug delivery reagents, and our IVD products in our Eden Prairie, Minnesota facility. In certain limited circumstances, we also provide contract manufacturing services for our customers, including, for example, coating their medical devices that are intended for pre clinical and clinical development (including human clinical trials), and products that are sold for commercial use by our customers. We manufacture balloon catheters in our Ballinasloe, Ireland facility, which offers a suite of capabilities, including balloon forming, extrusion, coating, braiding and assembly of finished products. We plan to manufacture substantially all of our whole product solutions devices in our Irish facility by the end of fiscal 2018. We attempt to maintain multiple sources of supply for the key raw materials used to manufacture our products. We do, however, purchase some raw materials from single sources, but we believe that additional sources of supply are readily available. Further, to the extent additional sources of supply are not readily available, we believe that we could manufacture such raw materials. We follow quality management procedures in accordance with applicable regulations and guidance for the development and manufacture of materials and device, biotechnology or combination products that support clinical trials and commercialization. In an effort to better meet our customers needs in this area, our Eden Prairie, Minnesota facility is certified to ISO 13485 and ISO 9001 Our facility in Ballinasloe, Ireland is certified to ISO 13485. Each of these facilities is registered with the U.S. FDA as a Contract Manufacturer. 11 Government Regulation The medical devices, IVD and biotechnology products incorporating our technologies are required to undergo long, expensive and uncertain regulatory review processes that are governed by the U.S. FDA and other international regulatory authorities. New medical devices utilizing our surface modification coating technologies can only be marketed in the U.S. after a 510(k) application has been cleared or a PMA application has been approved by the FDA. This process can take anywhere from several months (e.g., for medical device products seeking regulatory approval under the 510(k) approval process) to several years (e.g., for medical device products seeking regulatory approval under the PMA application process). With respect to our customers products that incorporate our surface modification coating and IVD technologies, the burden of securing regulatory approval typically rests with our customers as the medical device manufacturers. During fiscal 2017, 2016 and 2015, Surmodics had multiple customers obtain regulatory clearance on medical devices incorporating our Serene coating platform. With respect to our whole product solutions, including the SurVeil DCB and any additional medical device products that we develop, the burden of securing regulatory approval will rest on us unless we partner with other organizations to pursue such approval. In support of our customers regulatory filings, we maintain various confidential Device Master Files with the FDA and provide technical information to other regulatory agencies outside the U.S. regarding the nature, chemical structure and biocompatibility of our reagents. Our licensees generally do not have direct access to these files. However, they may, with our permission, reference these files in their various regulatory submissions to these agencies. This approach allows regulatory agencies to understand in confidence the details of our technologies without us having to share this highly confidential information with our customers. U.S. legislation allows companies, prior to obtaining FDA clearance or approval to market a medical product in the U.S., to manufacture medical products in the U.S. and export them for sale in international markets. This generally allows us to realize earned royalties so1r. However, sales of medical products outside the U.S. are subject to international requirements that vary from country to country. The time required to obtain approval for sale internationally may be longer or shorter than that required by the FDA. Employees As of November 30, 2017, we had 257 employees. Of these employees we employ 101 outside the U.S., primarily in R&D and manufacturing operations functions. We are not a party to any collective bargaining agreements. We believe that our future success will depend in part on our ability to attract and retain qualified technical, management and marketing personnel. We are committed to developing and providing our employees opportunities to contribute to our growth and success. 12 EXECUTIVE OFFICERS OF THE REGISTRANT As of December 1, 2017, the names, ages and positions of the Company executive officers are as follows Name Age Position Gary R. Maharaj 54 President and Chief Executive Officer Timothy J. Arens 50 Vice President of Corporate Development and Strategy Thomas A. Greaney 51 Chief Operating Officer, Medical Devices Andrew D. C. LaFrence 54 Vice President of Finance and Information Systems and Chief Financial Officer Charles W. Olson 53 Senior Vice President of Commercial and Business Development, Medical Devices Bryan K. Phillips 46 Senior Vice President, Legal and Human Resources, General Counsel and Secretary Joseph J. Stich 52 Vice President and General Manager, In Vitro Diagnostics Gregg S. Sutton 58 Vice President of Research and Development, Medical Devices Gary R. Maharaj joined the Company in December 2010 as President and Chief Executive Officer and was also appointed to the Surmodics Board of Directors at such time. Prior to joining Surmodics, Mr. Maharaj served as President and Chief Executive Officer of Arizant Inc., a provider of patient temperature management systems in hospital operating rooms, from 2006 to 2010. Previously, Mr. Maharaj served in several senior level management positions for Augustine Medical, Inc. (predecessor to Arizant Inc.) from 1996 to 2006, including Vice President of Marketing, and Vice President of Research and Development. During his approximately 30 years in the medical device industry, Mr. Maharaj has also served in various management and research positions for the orthopedic implant and rehabilitation divisions of Smith & Nephew, PLC. Mr. Maharaj holds an M.B.A. from the University of Minnesota Carlson School of Management, an M.S. in biomedical engineering from the University of Texas at Arlington and the University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center at Dallas, and a B.Sc. in Physics from the University of the West Indies. Timothy J. Arens joined the Company in February 2007 as Director, Business Development and became Senior Director of Financial Planning and Analysis and General Manager, In Vitro Diagnostics in October 2010. He was promoted to Vice President of Finance and Interim Chief Financial Officer in August 2011 and in February 2013 became Vice President Corporate Development and Strategy. Prior to joining Surmodics, Mr. Arens was employed at St. Jude Medical, Inc., a medical technology company, from 2003 to 2007, in positions of increasing responsibility related to business development and strategic planning functions. Mr. Arens received a B.S. degree in Finance from the University of Wisconsin Eau Claire in 1989 and an M.B.A. degree from the University of Minnesota Carlson School of Management in 1996. Thomas A. Greaney joined the Company in November 2015 as Vice President of Operations and General Manager of Creagh Medical, after we acquired it. In August 2017, Mr. Greaney was promoted to Chief Operating Officer, Medical Devices. Prior to joining Surmodics, he served as Chief Executive Officer for Creagh Medical, from September 2005 to November 2015. Prior to his tenure in Creagh Medical, Mr. Greaney served in a variety of roles with Boston Scientific for 10 years including the world wide operations responsibility for the Taxus Stent commercialization. From 1989 to 1995 he worked for a number of Electronics companies in a variety of engineering and management roles. Mr. Greaney received a B.E in Industrial Engineering in 1988 and a post grad Diploma in Quality Assurance in 1989, both from the National University of Ireland Galway. Andrew D. C. LaFrence joined the Company in February 2013 as Vice President of Finance and Chief Financial Officer and was also named Vice President of Information Systems in August 2016. Prior to joining Surmodics, he served as Chief Financial Officer for CNS Therapeutics, which developed and marketed pharmaceuticals for site specific drug delivery to the central nervous system, from January 2011 to January 2013 Prior to joining CNS, Mr. LaFrence served as interim Chief Financial Officer of International Green Power from July 2010 to January 2011 Mr. LaFrence has over 30 years of financial and management experience including 26 years at KPMG LLP where, from 1996 to 2010, he was an audit partner focusing on supporting venture backed, high growth medical technology, pharmaceutical, biotech and clean tech private and public companies. Mr. LaFrence is a certified public accountant and received a bachelor's degree in accounting and a minor in business administration from Illinois State University in 1984. Charles W. Olson joined the Company in July 2001 as Market Development Manager, was promoted in December 2002 to Director, Business Development, named General Manager of the Hydrophilic Technologies business unit in April 2004, and promoted to Vice President and General Manager, Hydrophilic Technologies in October 2004. In April 2005, the position of Vice President, Sales was added to his responsibilities. In November 2008, Mr. Olson was named Vice President of our Cardiovascular business unit, 13 in October 2010, he was named Senior Vice President and Ge neral Manager, Medical Device, and in August 2016 he was named Senior Vice President of Commercial and Business Development, Medical Devices. Prior to joining Surmodics, Mr. Olson was employed as General Manager at Minnesota Extrusion from 1998 to 2001 and at Lake Region Manufacturing in project management and technical sales from 1993 to 1998. Mr. Olson received a B.S. degree in Marketing from Winona State University in 1987. Bryan K. Phillips joined the Company in July 2005 as Patent Counsel and Assistant General Counsel. In January 2006, Mr. Phillips was appointed Corporate Secretary, and he was promoted to Deputy General Counsel in October 2007. He was promoted to Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary in September 2008 and was promoted to Senior Vice President in October 2010. In August 2011, he became Senior Vice President, Legal and Human Resources, General Counsel and Secretary. Prior to joining Surmodics, Mr. Phillips served as patent counsel at Guidant Corporation Cardiac Rhythm Management Group where he was responsible for developing and implementing intellectual property strategies and also for supporting the company business development function. He also practiced law at the Minneapolis based law firm of Merchant & Gould P.C. Mr. Phillips received a B.S. degree in Mechanical Engineering from the University of Kansas in 1993 and a law degree from the University of Minnesota Law School in 1999. He is admitted to the Minnesota bar and is registered to practice before the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office. Joseph J. Stich joined the Company in March 2010 as Vice President of Marketing, Corporate Development and Strategy. In August 2011, he became Vice President, Business Operations and General Manager, In Vitro Diagnostics and in September 2013 his role was adjusted to Vice President and General Manager, In Vitro Diagnostics. Before joining Surmodics, Mr. Stich was Vice President of Corporate Development for Abraxis BioScience, LLC, a biotechnology company focused on oncology therapeutics, from 2009 to 2010. Prior to joining Abraxis, he was a Vice President for MGI Pharma, Inc., a biopharmaceutical company, from 2005 to 2009. Mr. Stich prior experience also includes serving as President COO of Pharmaceutical Corp. of America (a subsidiary of Publicis Healthcare Specialty Group), and positions of increasing responsibility in sales and marketing at Sanofi Aventis Pharmaceuticals. He received a B.B.A. degree from the University of Wisconsin Whitewater in 1988, and an M.B.A. degree from Rockhurst University in Kansas City, Missouri in 1996. Gregg S. Sutton joined the Company in January 2016 as Vice President of Research and Development, Medical Devices. Prior to joining Surmodics, he served as President and CEO of NorMedix, Inc., which we acquired in fiscal 2016, since June 2009. Mr. Sutton is a veteran medical device designer and developer with over 25 years of engineering experience in the medical device industry. He co founded and held executive positions at several highly successful, early stage development device companies, including Atritech, Angioguard, Vascular Solutions, and Navarre Biomedical, leading teams in development and launch of high profile, first of their kind devices. With a degree in mechanical engineering and over 50 patents granted, he has substantial experience in all aspects of medical device development, including intellectual property, design, product development, and manufacturing. The executive officers of the Company are elected by and serve at the discretion of the Board of Directors. N1 of our executive officers are related to any other executive officer or any of our directors. 14 ITEM 1A. RI SK FACTORS . RISKS RELATING TO OUR BUSINESS, STRATEGY AND INDUSTRY The loss of, or significant reduction in business from, 1 or more of our major customers could significantly reduce our revenue, earnings or other operating results. A significant portion of our revenue is derived from a relatively small number of customers. We have 1 customer that provided more than 10% of our revenue in fiscal 2017. Revenue from Medtronic represented approximately 18% of our total revenue for the fiscal year ended September 30, 2017 and was generated from multiple products and fields of use. The loss of Medtronic or any of our largest customers, or reductions in business from them, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, results of operations, and cash flow. There can be no assurance that revenue from any customer will continue at their historical levels. If we cannot broaden our customer base, we will continue to depend on a small number of customers for a significant portion of our revenue. The long term success of our business may suffer if we are unable to expand our licensing base. We intend to continue pursuing a strategy of licensing our coatings technologies to a diverse array base of medical device companies, thereby expanding the commercialization opportunities for our technologies. A significant portion of our revenue is derived from customer devices used in connection with procedures in cardiovascular, peripheral vascular and other applications. As a result, our business is susceptible to adverse trends in procedures. Further, we may also be subject to adverse trends in specific markets such as the cardiovascular industry, including declines in procedures using our customers products as well as declines in average selling prices from which we earn royalties. Our success will depend, in part, on our ability to attract new licensees, to enter into agreements for additional applications with existing licensees and to develop technologies for use in applications outside of cardiovascular. There can be no assurance that we will be able to identify, develop and adapt our technologies for new applications in a timely and cost effective manner; that new license agreements will be executed on terms favorable to us; that new applications will be accepted by customers in our target markets; or that products incorporating newly licensed technology, including new applications, will gain regulatory approval, be commercialized or gain market acceptance. Delays or failures in these efforts could have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition and operating results. Surface modification, device drug delivery and medical device products are competitive markets and carry the risk of technological obsolescence and we face increased competition in our In Vitro Diagnostics segment. We operate in a competitive and evolving field, and new developments are expected to continue at a rapid pace. Our success depends, in part, upon our ability to maintain a competitive position in the development of technologies and products in the field of surface modification and device drug delivery. Our surface modification and device drug delivery technologies compete with technologies developed by a number of other companies. In addition, many medical device manufacturers have developed, or are engaged in efforts to develop, drug delivery or surface modification technologies for use on their own products. With respect to commercialization of our whole product solutions, we expect to face competitive pricing pressures from larger OEM suppliers, as well as some of our largest medical device partners that have in house resources that produce similar products. Some of our existing and potential competitors (especially medical device manufacturers pursuing coating solutions through their own R&D efforts) have greater financial and technical resources as well as production and marketing capabilities than us. Further, even if we are successful with respect to our plan to develop 12 15 medical device products over the next five years, we will be competing with companies that may be better able to leverage existing sales forces. Competitors may succeed in developing competing technologies or obtaining governmental approval for products before us. Products incorporating our competitors technologies may gain market acceptance more rapidly than products using ours. Developments by competitors may render our existing and potential products uncompetitive or obsolete. Furthermore, there can be no assurance that new products or technologies developed by others, or the emergence of new industry standards, will not render our products or technologies or licensees products incorporating our technologies uncompetitive or obsolete. Any new technologies that make our drug delivery, surface modification or In Vitro Diagnostics technologies less competitive or obsolete would have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We may not be successful in implementing our whole products solutions strategy and related important strategic initiatives Since fiscal 2013, with our investment in our DCB platform, we have been focused on a key growth strategy for our medical device business by expanding to offer whole product solutions to our medical device customers. Our aim is to provide customers earlier access to highly differentiated products that address unmet clinical needs, and partner with them on successful commercialization. If we are unable to identify and enter into arrangements with our medical device customers for the 15 commercialization of our products, we may seek to market and sell these products throug h third party distributors or via direct sales. Successfully implementing our whole products solutions strategy and related strategic initiatives will place substantial demands on our resources and management time, and require, among other things continued enhancement of our medical device R&D capabilities, including those needed to support the clinical evaluation and regulatory approval for our whole product solutions; effective coordination and integration of our research facilities and teams, particularly those located in different facilities; successful hiring and training of personnel; effective management of a business geographically located both in the United States and Ireland; commercialization of our products, including through strategic partnerships with our medical device customers, third party distributors, or via direct sales; sufficient liquidity to support substantial investments in R&D required to make our strategy successful; and increased marketing and sales support activities. There is no assurance that we will be able to successfully implement our whole products strategy and related strategic initiatives in accordance with our expectations, which could impact our ability to realize an acceptable return on the investments we are making in connection with this strategy, and may result in an adverse impact on our business and financial results. Failure to identify acquisition opportunities or to integrate acquired businesses into our operations successfully may limit our growth. An important part of our growth in the future may involve the acquisition of complementary businesses or technologies. Our identification of suitable acquisition candidates involves risks inherent in assessing the technology, value, strengths, weaknesses, overall risks and profitability, if any, of acquisition candidates. We may not be able to identify suitable acquisition candidates, or we may be unable to execute acquisitions due to competition from buyers with more resources. If we do not make suitable investments and acquisitions, we may find it more difficult to realize our growth objectives. The process of integrating acquired businesses into our operations, including our Fiscal 2016 Acquisitions, poses numerous risks, including an inability to integrate acquired operations, personnel, technology, information systems, and internal control systems and products; a lack of understanding of tax, legal and cultural differences; diversion of management attention, including the need to manage several remote locations with a limited management team; difficulties and uncertainties in transitioning the customers or other business relationships from the acquired entity to us; and the loss of key employees of acquired companies. In addition, future acquisitions by us may be dilutive to our shareholders ownership, and cause large 1 time expenses or create goodwill or other intangible assets that could result in future significant asset impairment charges. In addition, if we acquire entities that have not yet commercialized products but rather are developing technologies for future commercialization, our earnings per share may fluctuate as we expend significant funds for continued R&D efforts necessary to commercialize such acquired technology. We cannot guarantee that we will be able to successfully complete any acquisitions or that we will realize any anticipated benefits from acquisitions that we complete. 16 Our failure to expand our management systems and controls to support anticipated growth or integrate acquisitio ns could seriously harm our operating results and business. Our operations are expanding, and we expect this trend to continue as we execute our business strategy. Executing our business strategy has placed significant demands on management and our administrative, development, operational, information technology, manufacturing, financial and personnel resources. Accordingly, our future operating results will depend on the ability of our officers and other key employees to continue to implement and improve our operational, development, customer support and financial control systems, and effectively expand, train and manage our employee base. Otherwise, we may not be able to manage our growth successfully. Goodwill or other assets on our balance sheet may become impaired, which could have a material adverse effect on our operating results. We have a significant amount of goodwill and intangible assets on our balance sheet in connection with our acquisitions. As of September 30, 2017, we had $27.3 million of goodwill and indefinite lived intangible assets on our consolidated balance sheet related to our Medical Device and IVD segments, of which $19.3 million related to our Fiscal 2016 Acquisitions in our Medical Device reporting unit. As required by the accounting guidance for non amortizing intangible assets, we evaluate at least annually the potential impairment of the goodwill and trademark. Testing for impairment of non amortizing intangible assets involves the determination of the fair value of our reporting units. The estimation of fair values involves a high degree of judgment and subjectivity in the assumptions used. We also evaluate other assets on our balance sheet, including strategic investments and intangible assets, whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that their carrying value may not be recoverable. Our estimate of the fair value of the assets may be based on fair value appraisals or discounted cash flow models using various inputs. During fiscal 2017 and 2016, we recorded impairment charges on our indefinite lived intangible assets of $0.4 million and $0.1 million, respectively, related to non amortizing intangible assets arising from the Creagh Medical acquisition. Future impairment of the goodwill or other assets on our balance sheet could materially adversely affect our results of operations. Research and development costs may adversely affect our operating results. The success of our business depends on a number of factors, including our continued research and development of new technologies for future commercialization. In recent years, we have expended considerable resources researching and developing our DCB platform. In fiscal 2018, we expect to continue the clinical evaluation of the SurVeil DCB and will conduct additional development activities for the below the knee, AV fistula and other whole product solutions products, which will result in significant expenses that will adversely affect our operating results, including our profitability, in fiscal 2018 and future periods. Additionally, these activities are subject to risks of failure that are inherent in the development of new medical technologies or products. There can be no assurance that we will be successful in developing new technologies or products, or that any such technology will be commercialized. We recognize revenue in accordance with various complex accounting standards, and changes in circumstances or interpretations may lead to accounting adjustments. Our revenue recognition policies involve application of various complex accounting standards, including accounting guidance associated with revenue arrangements with multiple deliverables. Our compliance with such accounting standards often involves management judgment regarding whether the criteria set forth in the standards have been met such that we can recognize as revenue the amounts that we receive as payment for our products or services. We base our judgments on assumptions that we believe to be reasonable under the circumstances. However, these judgments, or the assumptions underlying them, may change over time. In addition, the SEC or the Financial Accounting Standards Board ( FASB ) may issue new positions or revised guidance on the treatment of complex accounting matters. Changes in circumstances or third party guidance could cause our judgments to change with respect to our interpretations of these complex standards, and transactions recorded, including revenue recognized, for 1 or more prior reporting periods, could be adversely affected. As described below in I, Item 7 Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations. , the FASB issued new revenue recognition guidance for recognizing revenue from contracts with customers in May 2014. This accounting standard will be effective for us beginning in the first quarter of fiscal 2019. We are currently evaluating the impact that the adoption of this standard will have on our business model and consolidated results of operations, cash flows and financial position. We currently believe the impact will be material due to the risks associated with implementing the new standards and ensuring accuracy in our reporting during the transition, the acceleration of minimum license fees and a 1 quarter acceleration of royalty revenue pursuant to our hydrophilic license agreements, as well as requiring several additional financial 17 statement footnote disclosures. We will also need to update and enhance our internal accounting systems, processes and our internal controls ove r financial reporting. This has required, and will continue to require, additional investments by us, and may require incremental resources and system configurations that could increase our operating costs in future periods. If we are not able to properly implement the new revenue recognition standards in a timely manner, the revenue that we recognize and the related disclosures that we provide under the new standards may not be complete or accurate, and we could fail to meet our financial reporting obligat ions in a timely manner, which could result in, among other things, regulatory discipline and adversely affect our stock price. With our fiscal 2016 acquisition of Creagh Medical, our business includes foreign operations which exposes us to certain risks related to fluctuations in U.S. dollar and foreign currency exchange rates. The Company reports its consolidated financial statements in U. S. dollars. In a period where the U.S. dollar is strengthening or weakening as compared with the Euro, our revenue and expenses denominated in the Euro are translated into U.S. dollars at a lower or higher value than they would be in an otherwise constant currency exchange rate environment. In addition, we have Euro denominated contingent consideration liabilities that are subject to exchange rate fluctuations, which are scheduled to be paid in the first quarter of our fiscal 2019 and we have not hedged this foreign currency exposure. During fiscal 2017 and 2016, we recorded foreign currency exchange losses of $0.5 million and $0.4 million, respectively. The losses were primarily related to these Euro denominated liabilities. As our foreign operations expand, the effects may become material to our consolidated financial statements. We have previously identified material weaknesses in our internal control over financial reporting. While these particular material weaknesses have been remediated, if we do not maintain effective internal control over financial reporting, our operating results could require material modification and our financial reports may not be reliable. A material weakness was identified in a prior year related to the design and operating effectiveness of our transactional and review controls related to recognition of royalty revenue. We have since remediated the material weakness by taking the steps described below in I, Item 9A. Controls and Procedures. . The Company conducted an evaluation under the supervision and with the participation of the Company management, including the Company Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer regarding the effectiveness of the design and operation of the Company disclosure controls and procedures pursuant to Rule 13a 15(b) of the Exchange Act. Based upon that evaluation, the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that the Company disclosure controls and procedures were effective as of September 30, 2017. Although we are committed to continuing to improve our internal control processes to ensure the adequacy of the internal controls over financial reporting, any control system, regardless of how well designed, operated and evaluated, can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that its objectives will be met. Therefore, we cannot be certain that, in the future, additional material weaknesses or significant deficiencies will not exist or otherwise be discovered. If other deficiencies or material weaknesses exist, it could result in misstatements of our results of operations, a restatement of our financial statements for 1 or more prior periods, a decline in our stock price and investor confidence or other material effects on our business, reputation, results of operations, financial condition or liquidity. RISKS RELATING TO OUR OPERATIONS AND RELIANCE ON THIRD PARTIES We rely on third parties to market, distribute and sell most products incorporating our coating technologies. A principal element of our business strategy is to enter into licensing arrangements with medical device and other companies that manufacture products incorporating our technologies. For the fiscal years ended September 30, 2017, 2016 and 2015, we have derived 44%, 47%, and 51%, respectively, of our revenue from royalties and license fees derived from such licensing arrangements. The revenue that we derive from such arrangements is dependent on our licensees ability to successfully develop, obtain successful regulatory approval for, manufacture (if applicable), market and sell products incorporating our technologies. Additionally, a licensee could modify their product in such a way that it no longer incorporates our technology. Many of these factors are outside of our control and the failure on the part of our licensees to successfully meet these requirements could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Moreover, under our standard license agreements, licensees can terminate the license for any reason upon 90 days prior written notice. Existing and potential licensees have no obligation to deal exclusively with us and may pursue parallel development 18 or licensing of competing technologies on their own or with third parties. A decision by a licensee to terminate its relationship with us could materially adversely affect our business, financial co ndition and results of operations. Failure on the part of our licensees to successfully meet these requirements could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. A portion of our IVD business relies on distribution agreements and relationships with various third parties and any adverse change in those relationships could result in a loss of revenue and harm that business. We sell many of our IVD products outside of the United States through distributors. Some of our distributors also sell our competitors products, and if they favor our competitors products for any reason, they may fail to market our products as effectively or to devote resources necessary to provide effective sales, which would cause our results to suffer. Additionally, we serve as the exclusive distributor in the United States, Canada and Puerto Rico for DIARECT AG for its recombinant and native antigens. The success of these arrangements with these third parties depends, in part, on the continued adherence to the terms of our agreements with them. Any disruption in these arrangements will adversely affect our financial condition and results of operations. We rely on our customers to accurately report and make payments under our agreements with them. We rely on our customers to determine whether the products that they sell are royalty bearing and, if so, report and pay the amount of royalties owed to us under our agreements with them. The majority of our license agreements with our customers give us the right to audit their records to verify the accuracy of their reports to us. However, these audits can be expensive, time consuming and possibly detrimental to our ongoing business relationships with our customers. While we have undertaken audits of certain of our customers in the past, we generally rely on the accuracy of the reports that they provide to us. Inaccuracies in these reports has resulted in, and could result in additional overpayments or underpayments of royalties, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We have limited or no redundancy in our manufacturing facilities, and we may lose revenue and be unable to maintain our customer relationships if we lose our production capacity. We manufacture all of our Medical Device coating reagents (and provide coating manufacturing services for certain customers) and our IVD products at our Eden Prairie, Minnesota facility. We also manufacture balloon catheter products at our facility in Ballinasloe, Ireland and catheter based medical devices in limited quantities in Plymouth, Minnesota. If our existing production facilities becomes incapable of manufacturing products for any reason, we may be unable to meet production requirements, we may lose revenue and we may not be able to maintain our relationships with our customers, including certain of our licensees. In particular, because most of our customers use our coating reagents to manufacture their own products that generate royalty revenue for us, failure by us to supply these reagents could result in decreased royalty revenue, as well as decreased revenue from our surface modification coating technologies product sales. Without our existing production facilities, we would have no other means of manufacturing products until we were able to restore the manufacturing capability at these facilities or develop 1 or more alternative manufacturing facilities. Although we carry business interruption insurance to cover lost revenue and profits in an amount we consider adequate, this insurance does not cover all possible situations. In addition, our business interruption insurance would not compensate us for the loss of opportunity and potential adverse impact on relations with our existing customers resulting from our inability to produce products for them. We may face product liability claims related to participation in clinical trials or the use or misuse of our products. The development and sale of medical devices and comp1nt products involves an inherent risk of product liability claims. For medical device products that incorporate our coating technology, most of the license provide us with indemnification against such claims. However, there can be no guarantee that product liability claims will not be filed against us for such products, or for medical device products that we manufacture as part of our whole product solutions strategy, that parties indemnifying us will have the financial ability to honor their indemnification obligations or that such manufacturers will not seek indemnification or other relief from us for any such claims. Any product liability claims, with or without merit, could result in costly litigation, reduced sales, significant liabilities and diversion of our management time, attention and resources. We have obtained a level of liability insurance coverage that we believe is appropriate to our activities, however, we cannot be sure that our product liability insurance coverage is adequate or that it will continue to be available to us on acceptable terms, if at all. Furthermore, we do not expect to be able to obtain insurance covering our costs and losses as a result of any recall of products or devices incorporating our technologies 19 because of alleged defects, whether such recall is instituted by us, by a customer, or is required by a regulatory agency. A product liability claim, recall or other claim with respect to uninsured liabilities or for amounts in excess of insured liabilit ies could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Our revenue will be harmed if we cannot purchase sufficient comp1nts that we use in our manufacture of reagents. We currently purchase some of the comp1nts we use to manufacture reagents from sole suppliers. If any of our sole suppliers becomes unwilling to supply comp1nts to us, experiences an interruption in its production or is otherwise unable to provide us with sufficient material to manufacture our reagents, we will experience production interruptions. If we lose our sole supplier of any particular reagent comp1nt or are otherwise unable to procure all comp1nts required for our reagent manufacturing for an extended period of time, we may lose the ability to manufacture the reagents our customers require to commercialize products incorporating our technology. This could result in lost royalties and product sales, which would harm our financial results. Adding suppliers to our approved vendor list may require significant time and resources. We routinely attempt to maintain multiple suppliers of each of our significant materials, so we have alternative suppliers, if necessary. However, if the number of suppliers of a material is reduced, or if we are otherwise unable to obtain our material requirements on a timely basis and on favorable terms, our operations may be harmed. We are dependent upon key personnel and may not be able to attract qualified personnel in the future. Our success is dependent upon our ability to retain and attract highly qualified management and technical personnel. We face intense competition for such qualified personnel. We do not maintain key person insurance, and we generally do not enter into employment agreements, except with certain executive officers. Although we have non compete agreements with most employees, there can be no assurance that such agreements will be enforceable. The loss of the services of 1 or more key employees or the failure to attract and retain additional qualified personnel could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Security breaches and other disruptions could compromise our information and expose us to liability, which would cause our business and reputation to suffer. We collect and store sensitive data, including intellectual property, our proprietary business information and that of our customers, suppliers and business partners, and personally identifiable information of our customers and employees, on our ne2rks. The secure maintenance of this information is critical to our operations and business strategy. Despite our security measures, our information technology and infrastructure may be vulnerable to attacks by hackers resulting from employee error, malfeasance or other disruptions. Any such breach could compromise our ne2rks and the information stored there could be accessed, publicly disclosed, lost or stolen. Any such access, disclosure or other loss of information could result in legal claims or proceedings, and regulatory penalties, disrupt our operations and the services that we provide to our customers, damage our reputation and cause a loss of confidence in our products and services, any of which could adversely affect our business and competitive position. RISKS RELATING TO OUR INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY We may not be able to obtain, maintain or protect proprietary rights necessary for the commercialization of our technologies. Our success depends, in large part, on our ability to obtain and maintain patents, maintain trade secret protection, operate without infringing on the proprietary rights of third parties and protect our proprietary rights against infringement by third parties. We have been granted U.S. and foreign patents and have U.S. and foreign patent applications pending related to our proprietary technologies. There can be no assurance that any pending patent application will be approved, that we will develop additional proprietary technologies that are patentable, that any patents issued will provide us with competitive advantages or will not be challenged or invalidated by third parties, that the patents of others will not prevent the commercialization of products incorporating our technologies, or that others will not independently develop similar technologies or design around our patents. Furthermore, because we generate a significant amount of our revenue through licensing arrangements, the loss or expiration of patent protection for our licensed technologies will result in a reduction of the revenue derived from these arrangements which may have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flow, results of operations, financial position and prospects. 20 We may become involved in expensive and unpredicta ble patent litigation or other intellectual property proceedings which could result in liability for damages, or impair our development and commercialization efforts. Our commercial success also will depend, in part, on our ability to avoid infringing patent or other intellectual property rights of third parties. There has been substantial litigation regarding patent and other intellectual property rights in the medical device and pharmaceutical industries, and intellectual property litigation may be used against us as a means of gaining a competitive advantage. Intellectual property litigation is complex, time consuming and expensive, and the outcome of such litigation is difficult to predict. If we were found to be infringing any third party patent or other intellectual property right, we could be required to pay significant damages, alter our products or processes, obtain licenses from others, which we may not be able to do on commercially reasonable terms, if at all, or cease commercialization of our products and processes. Any of these outcomes could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Patent litigation or certain other administrative proceedings may also be necessary to enforce our patents or to determine the scope and validity of third party proprietary rights. These activities could result in substantial cost to us, even if the eventual outcome is favorable to us. An adverse outcome of any such litigation or interference proceeding could subject us to significant liabilities to third parties, require disputed rights to be licensed from third parties or require us to cease using our technology. Any action to defend or prosecute intellectual property would be costly and result in significant diversion of the efforts of our management and technical personnel, regardless of outcome, and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. If we are unable to keep our trade secrets confidential, our technology and proprietary information may be used by others to compete against us. We rely significantly upon proprietary technology, information, processes and know how that are not subject to patent protection. We seek to protect this information through trade secret or confidentiality agreements with our employees, consultants, potential licensees, or other parties as well as through other security measures. There can be no assurance that these agreements or any security measure will provide meaningful protection for our unpatented proprietary information. In addition, our trade secrets may otherwise become known or be independently developed by competitors. If we determine that our proprietary rights have been misappropriated, we may seek to enforce our rights which would draw upon our financial resources and divert the time and efforts of our management, and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. If we are unable to convert our customers to our advanced generation of hydrophilic coating technology, our royalty revenue may decrease. In our Medical Device business unit, we have licensed our PhotoLink hydrophilic technology to a number of our customers for use in a variety of medical device surface applications. We have several U.S. and international issued patents and pending international patent applications protecting various aspects of these technologies, including compositions, methods of manufacture and methods of coating devices. The expiration dates for these patents and the anticipated expiration dates of the patent applications range from fiscal 2020 to 2035. These patents and patent applications represent distinct families, with each family generally covering a successive generation of the technology, including improvements that enhance coating performance, manufacturability, or other important features desired by our customers. Among these, our third generation PhotoLink hydrophilic technology is protected by a family of patents that expired in November 2015 (in the U.S.) and October 2016 (in certain other countries). The royalty revenue associated with our third generation technology was approximately 12% of our fiscal 2017 revenue. Approximately 21% of our total revenue in fiscal 2017 was generated from our fourth generation PhotoLink technology, which are protected by a family of patents that will begin to expire in fiscal 2020. Of the license agreements using our early generation technologies, most will continue to generate royalty revenue at a reduced royalty rate beyond patent expiration. In recent years, we have successfully converted a number of our customers products utilizing these early generation technologies to 1 of our advanced generation technologies. While we are actively seeking to convert our customers to 1 of our advanced generations of our hydrophilic coating technology, there can be no assurance that we will be successful in doing so, or that those customers that have converted, or will convert, will sell products utilizing our technology which will generate earned royalty revenue for us. 21 If we or any of our licensees breach any of the agreements under which we have in licensed intellectual property from others, we could be deprived of important intellectual property ri ghts and future revenue. We are a party to various agreements through which we have in licensed or otherwise acquired rights to certain technologies that are important to our business. In exchange for the rights granted to us under these agreements, we have agreed to meet certain research, development, commercialization, sublicensing, royalty, indemnification, insurance or other obligations. If we or 1 of our licensees fails to comply with these obligations set forth in the relevant agreement through which we have acquired rights, we may be unable to effectively use, license, or otherwise exploit the relevant intellectual property rights and may be deprived of current or future revenue that is associated with such intellectual property. RISKS RELATING TO CLINICAL AND REGULATORY MATTERS The development of new products and enhancement of existing products requires significant research and development, clinical trials and regulatory approvals, all of which may be very expensive and time consuming and may not result in commercially viable products. The development of new products and enhancement of existing products requires significant investment in research and development, clinical trials and regulatory approvals. During fiscal 2017, we continued the development of the SurVeil DCB, including investigating additional clinical applications and uses of the platform. In October 2017, commenced enrollment of patients in TRANSCEND, the pivotal clinical trial for the SurVeil DCB. There can be no assurance that any products now in development, or that we may seek to develop in the future, will achieve technological feasibility, obtain regulatory approval or gain market acceptance. If we are unable to obtain regulatory approval for new products or enhanced products, our ability to successfully compete in the markets in which we participate may be materially adversely impacted. A delay in the development or approval of new products and technologies may also adversely impact the timing of when these products contribute to our future revenue and earnings growth. Healthcare policy changes may have a material adverse effect on us. Healthcare costs have risen significantly during the past decade. There have been and continue to be proposals by legislators, regulators and third party payers to keep these costs down. Certain proposals, if implemented, would impose limitations on the prices our customers will be able to charge for our products, or the amounts of reimbursement available for their products from governmental agencies or third party payers, or otherwise negatively impact pricing and reimbursement. Because a significant portion of our revenue is currently derived from royalties on products which constitute a percentage of our customer product selling price, these limitations could have an adverse effect on our revenue. The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (the ACA ) imposes significant new taxes on medical device makers who make up a significant portion of our customers. Although significant comp1nts of these taxes have been suspended for calendar 2016 and 2017, their status is unclear for 2018 and subsequent years, as is the future of the ACA itself. The legislation has resulted in a significant total cost increase to the medical device and diagnostic industries, which could have a material, negative impact on both the financial condition of our customers as well as on our customers ability to attract financing, their willingness to commit capital to development projects or their ability to commercialize their products utilizing our technology, any of which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. There continues to be substantial risk to our customers, and therefore us, from the uncertainty which continues to surround the future of health care delivery and reimbursement both in the U.S. and abroad. In particular, we cannot predict what other healthcare programs and regulations will ultimately be implemented at the federal or state level or the effect of any future legislation or regulation in the United States or abroad may have on our business. Whole product solutions medical devices and other products incorporating our technologies are subject to increasing scrutiny and regulations, including extensive approval clearance processes and manufacturing requirements. Any adverse regulatory and or enforcement action (for us or our licensees) may materially affect our financial condition and business operations. Our products and our business activities are subject to a complex regime of regulations. Additionally, certain state governments and the federal government have enacted legislation aimed at increasing transparency of industry interactions with health care providers. Any failure to comply with these legal and regulatory requirements could impact our business. In addition, we will continue to devote substantial additional time and financial resources to further develop and implement policies, systems, and 22 processes to comply with enhanced leg al and regulatory requirements, which may also impact our business. We anticipate that governmental authorities will continue to scrutinize our industry closely, and that additional regulation may increase compliance and legal costs, exposure to litigation , and other adverse effects to our operations. To varying degrees, the FDA and comparable agencies outside the US require us to comply with laws and regulations governing the development, testing, manufacturing, labeling, marketing, and distribution of our products. Our compliance with these laws and regulations takes significant time resources, involves stringent testing surveillance, involves attention to any needed product improvements (such as modifications, repairs, or replacements), and may include significant limitations of the uses of our products. Changes in existing regulations or adoption of new governmental regulations or policies could prevent or delay regulatory approval of products incorporating our technologies or subject us to additional regulation. Failure or delay by us or our licensees in obtaining FDA and other necessary regulatory approval or clearance, or the loss of previously obtained approvals, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Our facilities and procedures are subject to periodic inspections by the FDA to determine compliance with the FDA requirements. The results of these inspections can include inspectional observations on FDA Form 483, warning letters, or other forms of enforcement. The FDA has significantly increased its oversight of companies subject to its regulations, including medical device companies. If the FDA were to conclude that we are not in compliance with applicable laws or regulations, or that any of our medical devices are ineffective or pose an unreasonable health risk, the FDA could ban such medical devices, detain or seize adulterated or misbranded medical devices, order a recall, repair, replacement, or refund of such devices, refuse to grant pending pre market approval applications or require certificates of non U.S governments for exports, and or require us to notify health professionals and others that the devices present unreasonable risks of substantial harm to the public health. The FDA may also assess civil or criminal penalties against us, our officers or employees and impose operating restrictions on a company wide basis, or enjoin and or restrain certain conduct resulting in violations of applicable law. The FDA may also recommend prosecution to the U. S. Department of Justice. Any adverse regulatory action, depending on its magnitude, may restrict us from effectively marketing and selling our products and limit our ability to obtain future pre market clearances or approvals, and could result in a substantial modification to our business practices and operations. We may face liability if we mishandle or improperly dispose of the hazardous materials used in some of our research, development and manufacturing processes. Our research, development and manufacturing activities sometimes involve the controlled use of various hazardous materials. Although we believe that our safety procedures for handling and disposing of such materials comply with the standards prescribed by state and federal regulations, the risk of accidental contamination or injury from these materials cannot be completely eliminated. While we currently maintain insurance in amounts that we believe are appropriate, we could be held liable for any damages that might result from any such event. Any such liability could exceed our insurance and available resources and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Additionally, certain of our activities are regulated by federal and state agencies in addition to the FDA. For example, activities in connection with disposal of certain chemical waste are subject to regulation by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. We could be held liable in the event of improper disposal of such materials, even if these acts were d1 by third parties. Some of our reagent chemicals must be registered with the agency, with basic information filed related to toxicity during the manufacturing process as well as the toxicity of the final product. Failure to comply with existing or future regulatory requirements could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. RISKS RELATING TO OUR SECURITIES Our stock price has been volatile and may continue to be volatile. The trading price of our common stock has been, and is likely to continue to be, highly volatile, in large part attributable to developments and circumstances related to factors identified in Forward Looking Statements and Risk Factors. Our common stock price may rise or fall sharply at any time because of this volatility, as a result of sales executed by significant holders of our stock, and also because of short positions taken by investors from time to time in our stock. In the fiscal year ended September 30, 2017, the sale price for our common stock ranged from $2190 to $3180 per share. The market prices for securities of medical technology, drug delivery and biotechnology companies historically have been highly volatile, and the market has experienced significant price and volume fluctuations that may be unrelated to the operating performance of particular companies. 23 ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVE D STAFF COMMENTS . N1 ITEM 2 ITEM 2 PROPERTIES
